Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.420

Dissolution—Election.

The district may at any time be dissolved upon the vote of two-thirds of the qualified electors in the district at a special election called by the district board upon the question. The question shall be submitted as, "Shall the district be dissolved?", or words to that effect.

Notice of the election shall be published at least once a week for at least four weeks prior to the date of the election in a newspaper of general circulation in each county of the district.

[ 1957 c 153 s 42.]